Arkansas, session 2025, HB1053.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. Arkansas Code Title 20, Chapter 77, Subchapter 1, is
amended to add an additional section to read as follows:
20-77-153. Reimbursement for remote ultrasound procedures and remote
fetal nonstress tests.
(a)(1) The Arkansas Medicaid Program shall reimburse for remote
ultrasound procedures and remote fetal nonstress tests utilizing established
Current Procedural Terminology codes for remote ultrasound procedures and
fetal nonstress tests when the patient is in a residence or other off-site
location from the healthcare provider of the patient and the same standard of
care is met.
(2) Subdivision (a)(1) of this section shall apply to the fee-
for-service categories of the program and any managed care plan within the
program.
(b) A remote ultrasound and remote fetal nonstress test shall be
reimbursable when the healthcare provider uses digital technology that:
*JMB078*
11/25/2024 12:40:46 PM JMB078

HB1053
(1) Collects medical and other forms of health data from a
patient and electronically transmits the information securely to a healthcare
provider in a different location for interpretation and recommendation;
(2) Is compliant with the Health Insurance Portability and
Accountability Act of 1996, 42 U.S.C. § 1320d et seq., as it existed on
January 1, 2025; and
(3) Is approved by the United States Food and Drug
Administration.
(c) A remote fetal nonstress test shall be reimbursed under a Current
Procedural Terminology code 5905 in the same manner as an in-person clinic
fetal nonstress test with the place of service at home and shall use remote
monitoring solutions that are approved by the United States Food and Drug
Administration for on-label use for monitoring fetal heart rate, maternal
heart rate, and uterine activity.
(d) The Department of Human Services shall:
(1) Apply for any federal waiver, Medicaid state plan
amendments, or other authority necessary to implement this section; and
(2) Adopt rules to implement this section.

SECTION 2. DO NOT CODIFY. Rules.
(a) When adopting the initial rules required under this act, the
Department of Human Services shall file the final rules with the Secretary of
State for adoption under § 25-15-204(f):
(1) On or before January 1, 2026; or
(2) If approval under § 10-3-309 has not occurred by January 1,
2026, as soon as practicable after approval under § 10-3-309.
(b) The department shall file the proposed rules with the Legislative
Council under § 10-3-309(c) sufficiently in advance of January 1, 2026, so
that the Legislative Council may consider the rules for approval before
January 1, 2026.






11/25/2024 12:40:46 PM JMB078